Hawaii statutes.
§604-11 Jurisdiction of district courts;
ordinances. Jurisdiction is conferred upon the district courts to try all
cases arising from the violation of ordinances in force in the counties and to
impose the penalties in such ordinances prescribed for such offenses in like
manner as their original jurisdiction is exercised under the general law. [L
1907, c 118, §129; RL 1925, §1832; RL 1935, §3111; RL 1945, §6650; RL 1955,
§149-9; HRS §604-11; am L 1970, c 188, §19]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next